Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1230
Certificate of number; change of address; notice to commission.

Any holder of a certificate of number shall notify the commission within fifteen days if his address no longer conforms to the address appearing on the certificate and shall, as a part of such notification, furnish the commission with his new address. The commission shall provide in its rules and regulations for the alteration of an outstanding certificate to show the new address of the holder.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 30.